Ohio, session 136, HB308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3517.05 of the Revised Code be 6
amended to read as follows: 7
Sec. 3517.05. All party committees, the selection of which 8
is provided for in sections 3517.02 and 3517.03 of the Revised 9
Code, shall, except as otherwise provided in this section, serve 10
until the date of the organizational meeting provided for in 11
section 3517.04 of the Revised Code. A county central committee 12
shall serve until the sixth day after the date of the 13
declaration of the results by the board of elections of the 14
primary election in that county. In case of vacancies caused by 15
death, resignation, failure to elect, or removal from the 16
precinct, ward, township, or district from which a committeeman 17
committeeperson was chosen, the controlling committee or, if 18
authorized, the executive committee shall fill the vacancy for 19

H. B. No. 308 Page 2
As Introduced
the unexpired term by a majority vote of the members of such 20
committee. 21
If, at any time, more than one organized group claims to 22
be the rightful county central or executive committee, each such 23
group shall file a list of its officers and members as provided 24
in section 3517.06 of the Revised Code, and the board of 25
elections with which such lists are filed shall certify them to 26
the state central committee of the party concerned. The state 27
central committee shall meet within thirty days after receipt of 28
such certification and forthwith determine and certify which 29
committee shall be recognized as the rightful county central or 30
executive committee. 31
Section 2. That existing section 3517.05 of the Revised 32
Code is hereby repealed. 33